Utah statutes.
41-6a-1710.   Following near an authorized emergency vehicle or parking near fire apparatus prohibited.

Except for a person operating an authorized emergency vehicle, the operator of a vehicle may not:

(1)  follow closer than 500 feet any authorized emergency vehicle traveling in response to an emergency; or

(2)  stop the vehicle within 500 feet of a fire apparatus which has stopped in answer to a fire alarm.



Amended by Chapter 96, 2012 General Session

